Utah statutes.
10-3-904.   Books and supplies -- Recording, filing and inspection.

The city engineer's office shall be supplied with all necessary books, cases and supplies for recording and filing as required. The city engineer shall record and file all drawings and documents pertaining to public lands and improvements. Those made in his office shall be placed on record as soon as completed and shall then be open for public inspections, and any person copying the same or taking notes therefrom may do so in pencil only. He shall keep the records and files in good condition and turn the same over to his successor in office. He shall allow no alteration, mutilation or changes to be made in any matter of record, and shall be held strictly accountable for the same.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

